Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.260

Appointment of temporary additional members of boards and committees for administration and grading of examinations.

The secretary may, at the request of a board or committee established under Title 18 RCW under the administrative authority of the department of health, appoint temporary additional members for the purpose of participating as members during the administration and grading of practical examinations for licensure, certification, or registration. The appointment shall be for the duration of the examination specified in the request. Individuals so appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the board or committee, including the requirement to be licensed, certified, or registered. While serving as board or committee members, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and immunities and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular members of the board or committee. This authority is intended to provide for more efficient, economical, and effective examinations.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 320.]